Vermont statutes. Title 6 Agriculture
Chapter 5. Central Testing Laboratory

§ 121.
Creation and purpose.

There is created within the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets a central testing laboratory for the purpose of providing agricultural, environmental, and other necessary testing services.

HISTORY:

Amended

1981, No. 22

;

1989, No. 256

(Adj. Sess.), § 10(a), eff. Jan. 1, 1991;

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2015, No. 58

, § E.225.2;

2017, No. 65

, § 9, eff. June 8, 2017.

§ 122.
Fees.

Notwithstanding

32 V.S.A. § 603

, the Agency shall establish fees for providing agricultural, environmental, and other necessary testing services at the request of private individuals and State agencies. The fees shall be reasonably related to the cost of providing the services. Fees collected under this chapter shall be credited to a special fund which shall be established and managed pursuant to 32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 5, and which shall be available to the Agency to offset the cost of providing the services.

HISTORY:

Added

1975, No. 220

(Adj. Sess.), § 23; amended

1999, No. 49

, § 104;

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2015, No. 58

, § E.225.3;

2017, No. 65

, § 9, eff. June 8, 2017.

§ 123.
Regulated drugs.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the provisions of 18 V.S.A. chapter 84 shall not apply to the Secretary or designee in the otherwise lawful performance of his or her official duties requiring the possession or control of regulated drugs.

The central testing laboratory shall obtain a certificate of approval from the Department of Health pursuant to

18 V.S.A. § 4207

.

As used in this section, “regulated drug” shall have the same meaning as in

18 V.S.A. § 4201

.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 65

, § 9, eff. June 8, 2017.